Hawaii statutes.
§806-17 Circuits constitute district for
criminal trial by jury. The judicial circuits of the State established by
section 603-1 are deemed to be the "districts" referred to in Article
I, section 14, of the Constitution of the State with respect to the right to a
trial by jury in criminal prosecutions, until such time as the legislature of
the State shall otherwise provide. [L 1959, c 125, §2; HRS §711-17; ren L 1972,
c 9, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Venue, see HRPP rule 18.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next